Vermont, session 2025-2026, S62.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 341 is amended to read:
§ 341. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(3) “Privatization contract” means a contract or grant for services valued
at $25,000.00 or more per year, which is the same or substantially similar to
and in lieu of services previously provided, in whole or in part, by permanent,
classified State employees, and which results in a reduction in force of at least
one permanent, classified employee, or the elimination of a vacant position of
an employee covered by a collective bargaining agreement.
VT LEG #379382 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.62
2025 Page 2 of 7
* * *
Sec. 2. 3 V.S.A. § 343 is amended to read:
§ 343. PRIVATIZATION CONTRACTS; PROCEDURE
(a) An agency shall not enter into a privatization contract, unless all of the
following are satisfied:
(1)(A) Thirty-five days prior to the beginning of any open bidding
process, the agency provides written notice to the collective bargaining
representative of the intent to seek to enter a privatization contract. During
those 35 days, the collective bargaining representative shall have the
opportunity to discuss alternatives to contracting. Such alternatives may
include amendments to the contract if mutually agreed upon by the parties.
Notices regarding the bid opportunity may not be issued during the 35-day
discussion period. The continuation of discussions beyond the end of the 35-
day period shall not delay the issuance of notices.
(B) The agency shall prepare a specific written statement of the
services proposed to be the subject of the privatization contract, including the
specific quantity and standard or quality of the subject services. For each
position in which a bidder will employ any person pursuant to a privatization
contract and for which the duties are substantially similar to the duties
performed by a permanent, classified State employee, the statement shall also
include the minimum wage rate to be paid for each position, which shall not be
VT LEG #379382 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.62
2025 Page 3 of 7
less than the average step of the grade under which the comparable State
employee position is paid. This statement shall be subject to 1 V.S.A. chapter
5, subchapter 3 (Public Records Act).
(2) The proposed contract is projected to result in overall cost savings to
the State of at least 10 20 percent above the projected cost of having the
services provided by classified State employees.
* * *
(4) Every bid for a privatization contract shall include provisions
specifically establishing the wage rate for each position, which shall not be less
than the minimum wage rate contained in the statement described in
subdivision (1)(B) of this subsection. Every bid shall also include provisions
for the contractor to include in the contract the costs of health, dental, and
vision insurance plans for every employee employed pursuant to the contract at
least equal to the percentage paid by the State for State employees. The health
insurance plan described in the bid shall provide coverage to the employee and
the employee’s spouse and dependent children, if any.
(5) The agency and the Secretary of Administration shall each certify in
writing that:
(A) they have complied with all provisions of this section and with
all other applicable laws;
VT LEG #379382 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.62
2025 Page 4 of 7
(B) the quality of the services to be provided by the designated bidder
is likely to satisfy the quality requirements of the statement prepared pursuant
to subdivision (1) of this subsection (a);
(C) the designated bidder and its supervisory employee, while in the
employ of the designated bidder, have no record of substantial or repeated
willful noncompliance with any relevant federal or State regulatory statute,
including statutes concerning labor relations, occupational safety and health,
nondiscrimination and affirmative action, environmental protection, and
conflicts of interest; and
(D) the proposed privatization contract is in the public interest in that
it meets the applicable quality and fiscal standards set forth in this section.
(b) Each privatization contract shall include the following terms and
conditions:
(1) Provisions specifically establishing the wage rate for each position,
which shall not be less than the minimum wage rate contained in the statement
described in subdivision (a)(1) of this section.
(2) Provisions for the contractor to include in the contract the costs of
health, dental, and vision insurance plans for every employee employed
pursuant to the contract equal to the percentage paid by the State for State
employees. The health insurance plan shall provide coverage to the employee
and the employee’s spouse and dependent children, if any. Each contractor
VT LEG #379382 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.62
2025 Page 5 of 7
shall submit quarterly payroll records to the agency, which list the name,
address, hours worked, and the hourly wage paid for each employee in the
previous quarter.
(3) A provision that the agency shall not amend any privatization
contract if the amendment has the purpose or effect of voiding any requitement
of this section.
(4) A provision requiring the contractor to comply with a policy of
nondiscrimination and equal opportunity for all persons and to take affirmative
steps to provide such equal opportunity for all persons.
(5) A provision granting all employees employed under this contract just
cause employment protection.
(6) A provision requiring the contractor to comply with a policy of
whistleblower protection equal to those defined in sections 971–978 of this
title.
(c) Not more than 10 days after the 35-day period of review described in
subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section, and subsequent to the certification
described in subdivision (a)(5) of this section, a panel to be composed of the
Commissioner of Labor or designee, the Auditor of Accounts or designee, and
the president of the collective bargaining agent or designee shall issue a
decision on the compliance of the proposed privatization contract with the
terms of this title. If the proposed privatization contract does not comply with
VT LEG #379382 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.62
2025 Page 6 of 7
the requirements of this title, the contract shall be considered void ab initio,
and the Attorney General, a State’s Attorney, or the collective bargaining
representative may bring a civil action in the Superior Court of Washington
County to enjoin enforcement of the contract.
(d) The Attorney General is authorized, upon request, to investigate
whether the contract has met the prospective savings of 20 percent at any time
following the first 12 months of the contract; if not, the contract shall not be
renewed and the services shall be thereafter provided by classified State
employees.
(b)(e)(1) A privatization contract shall contain specific performance
measures regarding quantity, quality, and results and guarantees regarding the
services performed.
(2) The agency shall provide information in the State’s Workforce
Report on the contractor’s compliance with the specific performance measures
set out in the contract.
(3) The agency may not renew the contract if the contractor fails to
comply with the specific performance measures set out in the contract as
required by subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(c)(f)(1) Before an agency may renew a privatization contract for the first
time, the Auditor of Accounts shall review the privatization contract analyzing
whether it is achieving:
VT LEG #379382 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.62
2025 Page 7 of 7
(A) the 10 20 percent cost-savings requirement set forth in
subdivision (a)(2) of this section; and
(B) the performance measures incorporated into the contract as
required under subdivision (b)(e)(1) of this section.
(2) If the Auditor of Accounts finds that a privatization contract has not
achieved the cost savings required under subdivision (a)(2) of this section or
complied with performance measures required under subdivision (b)(e)(1) of
this section, the Auditor of Accounts shall file a report with the agency and the
House Committee on Government Operations and Military Affairs and Senate
Committees Committee on Government Operations, and the agency shall
review whether to renew the privatization contract or perform the work with
State employees.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379382 v.1